New Jersey, session 221, A4950.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In any year the New Jersey Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services participates in the National Core Indicators State of the Workforce Survey, or similar survey as determined by the division, the division shall also distribute such survey to eligible service providers.  Any eligible provider of services for persons with developmental disabilities that does not complete the survey shall be subject to a fine of $5,000 per year, which penalty shall be collected by the Commissioner of Human Services in a summary proceeding before a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 2.  The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act. STATEMENT Under this bill, in any year the Division of Developmental Disabilities participates in the National Core Indicators State of the Workforce Survey or a similar survey, the division would also be required to distribute the survey to each of the divisions eligible provider of services for developmental disabilities.  The eligible provider would be required to complete the workforce study or be subject to a fine of $5,000 per year of non-compliance.